Utah statutes.
53B-23-104.   Centers for processing requests for electronic versions of instructional materials.

(1)  The State Board of Regents may establish one or more centers to process requests for electronic versions of instructional materials pursuant to this chapter.

(2)  The institutions designated as within the jurisdiction of a center shall submit requests for instructional material to the center, which shall transmit the request to the publisher or manufacturer.

(3)  If there is more than one center, each center shall make every effort to coordinate requests.

(4)  The publisher or manufacturer of instructional material shall be required to honor and respond to only those requests submitted through a designated center.

(5)  If a publisher or manufacturer has responded to a request for instructional materials by a center, all subsequent requests for those instructional materials shall be satisfied by the center to which the request is made.

